Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB177.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) On November 4, 2026, and each Wednesday
following the first Tuesday in November in even-numbered years
thereafter, the commission shall publish the average percentage increase in
the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the midwest region as
published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department
of labor during the immediately preceding 12 months.
(b) On the dates specified in subsection (a), the dollar amounts set by
the following statutes shall be increased by the percentage published on
such date by the commission pursuant to subsection (a): K.S.A. 25-4148,
25-4148a, 25-4148b, 25-4148d, 25-4150, 25-4154, 25-4172, 25-4173, 25-
4174, 25-4175, 25-4176, 25-4180 and 25-4186. If the new amount of any
such dollar amounts is not a multiple of $50, then such amount shall be
rounded to the nearest multiple of $50. The amounts determined under this
subsection shall be effective for a period of two years.
(c) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the campaign
finance act.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 25-4153 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
4153. (a) The aggregate amount contributed to a candidate and such
candidate's candidate committee and to all party committees and political
committees and dedicated to such candidate's campaign, by any political
committee or any person except a party committee, the candidate or the
candidate's spouse, shall not exceed the following:
(1) For the pair of offices of governor and lieutenant governor or for
other state officers elected from the state as a whole, $2,000 $4,000 for
each primary election (, or in lieu thereof, a caucus or convention of a
political party), and an equal amount for each general election.
(2) For the office of member of the house of representatives, district
judge, district magistrate judge, district attorney or a candidate for local
office whose jurisdiction has a population that is fewer than 50,000, $500

SB 177 2
$1,000 for each primary election (, or in lieu thereof, a caucus or
convention of a political party), and an equal amount for each general
election.
(3) For the office of state senator or, member of the state board of
education or a candidate for local office whose jurisdiction has a
population that is 50,000 or more, $1,000 $2,000 for each primary election
(, or in lieu thereof, a caucus or convention of a political party), and an
equal amount for each general election.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the face value of a loan at the end
of the period of time allocable to the primary or general election is the
amount subject to the limitations of this section. A loan in excess of the
limits herein provided may be made during the allocable period if such
loan is reduced to the permissible level, when combined with all other
contributions from the person making such loan, at the end of such
allocable period.
(c) For the purposes of this section, all contributions made by
unemancipated children under 18 years of age shall be considered to be
contributions made by the parent or parents of such children. The total
amount of such contribution shall be attributed to a single custodial parent
and 50% of such contribution to each of two parents.
(d) The aggregate amount contributed to a state party committee by a
person other than a national party committee or a political committee shall
not exceed $15,000 in each calendar year; and the aggregate amount
contributed to any other party committee by a person other than a national
party committee or a political committee shall not exceed $5,000 in each
calendar year.
The aggregate amount contributed by a national party committee to a
state party committee shall not exceed $25,000 in any calendar year, and
the aggregate amount contributed to any other party committee by a
national party committee shall not exceed $10,000 in any calendar year.
The aggregate amount contributed to a party committee by a political
committee shall not exceed $5,000 in any calendar year.
(e) For purposes of this section, "jurisdiction" means:
(1) The city, county or school district if the candidate is seeking
election to a local office that is elected at large in such city, county or
school district; and
(2) the electoral district if the candidate is seeking election as a
member of a governing body that has member districts.
(e) Any political funds which that have been collected and were not
subject to the reporting requirements of this act shall be deemed a person
subject to these contribution limitations.
(f) Any political funds which that have been collected and were
subject to the reporting requirements of the campaign finance act shall not

SB 177 3
be used in or for the campaign of a candidate for a federal elective office.
(g) The amount contributed by each individual party committee of the
same political party other than a national party committee to any candidate
for office, for any primary election at which two or more candidates are
seeking the nomination of such party shall not exceed the following:
(1) For the pair of offices of governor and lieutenant governor and for
each of the other state officers elected from the state as a whole, $2,000 for
each primary election (or in lieu thereof a caucus or convention of a
political party).
(2) For the office of member of the house of representatives, district
judge, district magistrate judge, district attorney or a candidate for local
office, $500 for each primary election (or in lieu thereof a caucus or
convention of a political party).
(3) For the office of state senator or member of the state board of
education, $1,000 for each primary election (or in lieu thereof a caucus or
convention of a political party).
(h) When a candidate for a specific cycle does not run for office, the
contribution limitations of this section shall apply as though the individual
had sought office.
(i) No person shall make any contribution or contributions to any
candidate or the candidate committee of any candidate in the form of
money or currency of the United States which in the aggregate exceeds
$100 for any one primary or general election, and No candidate or
candidate committee of any candidate shall accept any contribution or
contributions in the form of money or currency of the United States which
in the aggregate exceeds $100 from any one person for any one primary or
general election.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 25-4153 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.